Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.165

Notice of pesticide use.

Schools as defined in RCW 17.21.415 shall provide notice of pesticide use to parents or guardians of students and employees pursuant to chapter 17.21 RCW, upon the request of the parent or guardian.

[ 2009 c 556 s 12; 2001 c 333 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 c 333: See note following RCW 17.21.020.